Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-122 Depositaries. The funds of
a domestic insurer shall not be deposited in any bank or banking institution
which has not first been approved as a depositary by the insurer's board of
directors or by a committee designated for the purpose. [L 1987, c 347, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next